New York, session 2025-2026, A4164.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The agriculture and markets law is amended by adding a new 2 section 214-p to read as follows: 3 § 214-p. Safety and quality labeling. 1. Definitions. For the purposes 4 of this article, the following terms shall have the following meanings: 5 (a) "Perishable food" shall mean and include (i) eggs, grade AA, grade 6 A, and grade B shell eggs; 7 (ii) all pre-packaged, fully or partially prepared baked goods which 8 have a moisture content exceeding eighteen percent, with or without 9 additives, known as: 10 (1) breads, rolls and buns as defined pursuant to title 21, chapter 1, 11 part 136.110 of the code of federal regulations, except those known as 12 fruitcakes; 13 (2) cakes, pastries, and cookies, except those that are offered for 14 sale in individual, portion pack, snack-type packages; 15 (3) english muffins, corn muffins, bran muffins, and other similar 16 products; 17 (iii) the following prepackaged dairy and dairy-type products: 18 (1) those products with or without additives or flavorings, known as 19 cheese, as defined pursuant to title 21, chapter 1, part 133 of the code 20 of federal regulations, that contain fifty percent or more moisture in 21 the finished product; 22 (2) low-fat, multi-vitamin, multi-mineral type milk products which are 23 normally stored at temperatures between thirty-two degrees fahrenheit 24 and forty degrees fahrenheit; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08153-01-5 A. 4164 2 1 (3) flavored milk; 2 (4) cultured milk, cultured milk products, cultured skim-milk, and 3 cultured skim-milk products, with or without fruits, vegetables, meats, 4 cheeses, or other additives; 5 (5) milk shake; 6 (6) eggnog; 7 (7) yogurt, made from skim-milk or whole milk, with or without fruits, 8 vegetables, meats, or other additives; 9 (8) whipped cream and instant whipped cream; 10 (9) sour cream, cultured cream, salad cream, and non-cultured sour 11 cream, with or without cultured half and half; 12 (10) sour half and half, cultured half and half, non-cultured sour 13 half and half, and non-cultured half and half; 14 (11) dairy dressing and dairy dip; 15 (12) non-dairy coffee creamers which are normally stored at temper- 16 atures between thirty-two degrees fahrenheit and forty degrees fahren- 17 heit; and 18 (iv) all pre-packaged, prepared foods which require refrigeration. 19 (b) "Packaged food" shall mean foods and beverages otherwise subject 20 to the nutrition labeling requirements of the federal Nutrition Labeling 21 and Education Act of 1990. 22 (c) "Safety date" shall mean the last day or date for safe consumption 23 or use of a perishable food or packaged food. 24 (d) "Quality date" shall mean the last day or date for the recommended 25 consumption or use of a perishable food or packaged food. 26 2. No person, firm, corporation, partnership, association or any other 27 business association shall sell at retail or display for sale at retail 28 any perishable food or packaged food for human consumption unless the 29 container of such perishable or packaged food is clearly marked with a 30 safety date and a quality date. 31 3. The commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of health, 32 shall promulgate rules and regulations regarding the content and place- 33 ment of safety dates and quality dates on perishable food and packaged 34 food. 35 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 36 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 37 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 38 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made on or 39 before such date.